Alaska statutes. Title 38. Public Land.
Article 1. Manner of Conveying State’s Interest in Land under Its Jurisdiction.

Sec. 38.95.010.
State’s interest may not be obtained by adverse possession or prescription.

No prescription or statute of limitations runs against the title or interest of the state to land under the jurisdiction of the state.
No title or interest to land under the jurisdiction of the state may be acquired by adverse possession or prescription, or in any other manner except by conveyance from the state.

History.

(§ 47-2-1 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 77 SLA 1955)

Revisor’s notes. —

Section 47-2-1 ACLA 1949 dealt with prescription against title of the United States to territorial lands and has been omitted as obsolete since statehood.
The 1955 amendment added the above wording to § 47-2-1 ACLA 1949.

Formerly AS 38.15.010.
Renumbered in 1973.

Administrative Code. —

For disposal by state of municipal trust land, see 3 AAC 190, art. 5.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The state’s title to land cannot be adversely possessed, and the right to repurchase similarly cannot be adversely possessed.
March 9, 1984, Op. Att’y Gen.